District of Columbia statutes.
16-2301.01

References deemed to refer to Family Court of the Superior Court.

Any reference in this chapter or any other Federal or District of Columbia law, Executive order, rule, regulation, delegation of authority, or any document of or pertaining to the Family Division of the Superior Court of the District of Columbia shall be deemed to refer to the Family Court of the Superior Court of the District of Columbia.

History

Jan. 8, 2002, 115 Stat. 2101, Pub. L. 107-114, § 2(d)(3)

Section References

This section is referenced in § 16-2301.